South Dakota, session 2026, SB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-19C:
Except as provided below, in written or printed official government material, a state
agency:
(1) May use only the term "Judea and Samaria," "Judea," or "Samaria" to refer to land
adjacent to Jordan that was obtained by Israel during the 1967 Six-Day War; and
(2) May not use the term "West Bank" to refer to the land.
For purposes of this section, the term "official government material" means an
administrative rule, briefing, communication, guidance, material, press release, or work
product document prepared by a state agency. The term does not include teaching or
research materials used or produced by postsecondary instructors employed by a state
agency.
For purposes of this section, the term "state agency" means every board,
commission, department, division, institution, and office of state government.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.